Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB1118.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 700. As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise: (a) "Criminal abuse" means 1 or more of the following: (i) An assault that is a violation or an attempt or conspiracy to commit a violation of sections 81 to 90 of the Michigan penal code, Act No. 328 of the Public Acts of 1931, being sections 750.81 to 750.90 of the Michigan Compiled Laws. sections 81 to 90 of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.81 to 750.90. Criminal abuse does not include an assault or an assault and battery that is a violation of section 81 of Act No. 328 of the Public Acts of 1939, being section 750.81 of the Michigan Compiled Laws, section 81 of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.81, and that is committed by a recipient against another recipient. (ii) A criminal homicide that is a violation or an attempt or conspiracy to commit a violation of section 316, 317, or 321 of Act No. 328 of the Public Acts of 1931, being sections 750.316, 750.317, and 750.321 of the Michigan Compiled Laws.section 316, 317, or 321 of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.316, 750.317, and 750.321. (iii) Criminal sexual conduct that is a violation or an attempt or conspiracy to commit a violation of sections 520b to 520e or 520g of Act No. 328 of the Public Acts of 1931, being sections 750.520b to 750.520e and 750.520g of the Michigan Compiled Laws.sections 520b to 520e or 520g of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.520b to 750.520e and 750.520g. (iv) Vulnerable adult abuse that is a violation or an attempt or conspiracy to commit a violation of section 145n of the Michigan penal code, Act No. 328 of the Public Acts of 1931, being section 750.145n of the Michigan Compiled Laws.section 145n of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.145n. (v) Child abuse that is a violation or an attempt or conspiracy to commit a violation of section 136b of Act No. 328 of the Public Acts of 1931, being section 750.136b of the Michigan Compiled Laws.section 136b of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.136b. (b) "Health care corporation" means a nonprofit health care corporation operating under the nonprofit health care corporation reform act, Act No. 350 of the Public Acts of 1980, being sections 550.1101 to 550.1704 of the Michigan Compiled Laws.1980 PA 350, MCL 550.1101 to 550.1704. (c) "Health care insurer" means an insurer authorized to provide health insurance in this state or a legal entity that is self-insured and provides health care benefits to its the legal entity's employees. (d) "Health maintenance organization" means an organization licensed under part 210 of the public health code, Act No. 368 of the Public Acts of 1978, being sections 333.21001 to 333.21098 of the Michigan Compiled Laws.section 3501 of the insurance code of 1956, 1956 PA 218, MCL 500.3501. (e) "Money" means any legal tender, note, draft, certificate of deposit, stock, bond, check, or credit card. (f) "Nonprofit dental care corporation" means a dental care corporation incorporated under Act No. 125 of the Public Acts of 1963, being sections 550.351 to 550.373 of the Michigan Compiled Laws.1963 PA 125, MCL 550.351 to 550.373. (g) "Person-centered planning" means a process for planning and supporting the individual receiving services that builds upon on the individual's capacity to engage in activities that promote community life and that honors the individual's preferences, choices, and abilities. The person-centered planning process involves families, friends, and professionals as the individual desires or requires. (h) "Privileged communication" means a communication made to a psychiatrist or psychologist in connection with the examination, diagnosis, or treatment of a patient, or to another person individual while the other person patient is participating in the examination, diagnosis, or treatment or a communication made privileged under other applicable state or federal law. (i) "Restraint" means the use of a physical device to restrict an individual's movement. Restraint does not include the use of a device primarily intended to provide anatomical support. (j) "Seclusion" means the temporary placement of a recipient in a room, alone, where egress is prevented by any means. (k) "State psychiatric hospital" means a psychiatric hospital operated by the department. (l) (k) "Support plan" means a written plan that specifies the personal support services or any other supports that are to be developed with and provided for a recipient. (m) (l) "Treatment plan" means a written plan that specifies the goal-oriented treatment or training services, including rehabilitation or habilitation services, that are to be developed with and provided for a recipient. Sec. 754. (1) The department shall establish a state office of recipient rights subordinate only to the director. (2) The department shall ensure all of the following: (a) The process for funding the state office of recipient rights includes a review of the funding by the state recipient rights advisory committee. (b) The state office of recipient rights will must be protected from pressures that could interfere with the impartial, even-handed, and thorough performance of its the state office of recipient rights' duties. (c) The state office of recipient rights will shall have unimpeded access to all of the following: (i) All programs and services operated by or under contract with the department except where unless other recipient rights systems authorized by this act exist. (ii) All staff employed by or under contract with the department. (iii) All evidence necessary to conduct a thorough investigation or to fulfill its the state office of recipient rights' monitoring function. (d) Staff of the state office of recipient rights receive training each year in recipient rights protection. (e) Each contract between the department and a provider requires both of the following: (i) That the provider and his or her the provider's employees receive annual training in recipient rights protection. (ii) That recipients will be are protected from rights violations while they the recipients are receiving services under the contract. (f) Technical assistance and training in recipient rights protection are available to all community mental health services programs and other mental health service providers subject to this act. (3) The department shall endeavor to ensure all of the following: (a) The state office of recipient rights has sufficient staff and other resources necessary to perform the duties described in this section. (b) Complainants, staff of the state office of recipient rights, and any staff acting on behalf of a recipient will be are protected from harassment or retaliation resulting from recipient rights activities. (c) Appropriate remedial action is taken to resolve violations of rights and notify the complainants of substantiated violations in a manner that does not violate employee rights. (4) After consulting with the state recipient rights advisory committee, the department director shall select a director of the state office of recipient rights who has the education, training, and experience to fulfill the responsibilities of the office of director of the state office of recipient rights. The department director shall not replace or dismiss the director of the state office of recipient rights without first consulting the state recipient rights advisory committee. The director of the state office of recipient rights shall have no direct service responsibility. The director of the state office of recipient rights shall report directly and solely to the department director. The department director shall not delegate his or her the director's responsibility under this subsection. (5) The state office of recipient rights may do all of the following: (a) Investigate apparent or suspected violations of the rights guaranteed by this chapter. (b) Resolve disputes relating to violations. (c) Act on behalf of recipients to obtain appropriate remedies for any apparent violations. (d) Apply for and receive grants, gifts, and bequests to effectuate any purpose of this chapter. (6) The state office of recipient rights shall do all of the following: (a) Ensure that recipients, parents of minor recipients, and guardians or other legal representatives have access to summaries of the rights guaranteed by this chapter and chapter 7a and are notified of those rights in an understandable manner, both at the time services are requested and periodically during the time services are provided to the recipient. (b) Ensure that the telephone number and address of the state office of recipient rights and the names of rights officers are conspicuously posted in all service sites. (c) Maintain a record system for all reports of apparent or suspected rights violations received, including a mechanism for logging in all complaints and a mechanism for secure storage of all investigative documents and evidence. (d) Create and maintain a record system for all incident reports received from each state psychiatric hospital, including a mechanism for logging all complaints and a mechanism for securely storing all investigative documents and evidence. (e) (d) Initiate actions that are appropriate and necessary to safeguard and protect rights guaranteed by this chapter to recipients of services provided directly by the department or by its the department's contract providers other than community mental health services programs. (f) (e) Receive reports of apparent or suspected violations of rights guaranteed by this chapter. The state office of recipient rights shall refer reports of apparent or suspected rights violations to the recipient rights office of the appropriate provider to be addressed by the provider's internal rights protection mechanisms. The state office of recipient rights shall intervene as necessary to act on behalf of recipients in situations in which the director of the department considers the rights protection system of the provider to be out of compliance with this act and rules promulgated under this act. (g) Create a process to monitor the incident reports received from each state psychiatric hospital under subdivision (d) to determine whether an event underlying an incident report involves an apparent or suspected rights violation. (h) (f) Upon On request, advise recipients of the process by which a rights complaint or appeal may be made and assist recipients in preparing written rights complaints and appeals. (i) (g) Advise recipients that there are advocacy organizations available to assist recipients in preparing written rights complaints and appeals and offer to refer recipients to those organizations. (j) (h) Upon On receipt of a complaint, advise the complainant of the complaint process, appeal process, and mediation option. (k) (i) Ensure that each service site operated by the department or by a provider under contract with the department, other than a community mental health services program, is visited by recipient rights staff with the frequency necessary for protection of rights but in no case less than annually. (l) (j) Ensure that all individuals employed by the department receive department-approved training related to recipient rights protection before or within not later than 30 days after being employed.employment begins. (m) (k) Ensure that all reports of apparent or suspected violations of rights within state facilities or programs operated by providers under contract with the department other than community mental health services programs are investigated in accordance with section 778 and that those reports that do not warrant investigation are recorded in accordance with subdivision (c). (n) (l) Review semiannual statistical rights data submitted by community mental health services programs and licensed hospitals to determine trends and patterns in the protection of recipient rights in the public mental health system and provide a summary of the data to community mental health services programs and to the director. of the department. (o) (m) Serve as consultant to the director in matters related to recipient rights. (p) (n) At least Not less than quarterly, provide summary complaint data consistent with the annual report required in subdivision (o),(q), together with a summary of remedial action taken on substantiated complaints, to the department and the state recipient rights advisory committee. (q) (o) Submit to the department director and to the committees and subcommittees of the legislature with legislative oversight of mental health matters, for availability to the public, an annual report on the current status of recipient rights for the state. in this state. The report shall must be submitted not later than March 31 of each year for the preceding fiscal year. The annual report shall must include, at a minimum, all of the following: (i) Summary data by type or category regarding the rights of recipients receiving services from the department including the number of complaints received by each state facility and other state-operated placement agency, the number of reports filed, and the number of reports investigated. (ii) The number of substantiated rights violations by category and by state facility. (iii) The remedial actions taken on substantiated rights violations by category and by state facility. (iv) Training received by staff of the state office of recipient rights. (v) Training provided by the state office of recipient rights to staff of contract providers. (vi) Outcomes of assessments of the recipient rights system of each community mental health services program. (vii) Identification of patterns and trends in rights protection in the public mental health system in this state. (viii) Review of budgetary issues including staffing and financial resources. (ix) Summary of the results of any consumer satisfaction surveys conducted. (x) Recommendations to the department. (r) (p) Provide education and training to its the recipient rights advisory committee and its the recipient rights appeals committee.